New Jersey, session 222, S1338.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in this act: Debt means any money, obligation, claim, or sum, due or owing, or alleged to be due or owing, from a current or former student, but does not include the fee, if any, charged to all students for the actual costs of providing the transcripts. Institution means an institution of higher education or a proprietary institution licensed to offer academic degrees. 2.    a. An institution shall not, due to an outstanding balance on a current or former students account: (1)  refuse to provide a transcript for a current or former student on the grounds that the student owes a debt; (2)  condition the provision of a transcript on the payment of a debt, other than a fee charged to provide the transcript; (3)  charge a higher fee for obtaining a transcript, or provide less favorable treatment of a transcript request because a current or former student owes a debt; or (4)  use transcript issuance as a tool for debt collection. b.  Failure by an institution to provide a transcript within 10 business days of the students request shall subject the institution to a penalty of $500 per day for each day of noncompliance, which shall be collected in proceedings in accordance with the "Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999," P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.). 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.